src/morphology/stems/noun.lexc
LEXICON N_NIMETÖN
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 34 tän
!!€ nimetön: nimetön+N+Sg+Nom # unnamed
!!€ nimettömänä: nimetön+N+Sg+Ess
0:ön  N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:tömä    N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:töm     N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:ön     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:tömä    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN ;
0:töm     N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:töm     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ön     N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:töm N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:ön N_COMPOUND_0    ;
0:öma N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:töm N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:ön  N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

!! !Lexicalised superlatives
!! The lexicalised superlatives have special inflection pattern.

LEXICON N_VANHIN
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 35 back
!!€ kylänvanhin: kylänvanhin+N+Sg+Nom # elder
!!€ kylänvanhimpana: kylänvanhin+N+Sg+Ess
0:n   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:mpa   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:mma   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:mp    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:mm    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:n   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:mpa   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:mp    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:mp    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:n   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:mpa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:mp    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:mma N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:mp  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_TEN    ;
0:mpa N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

LEXICON N_LÄHIN
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 35 front
!!€ lähin: lähin+N+Sg+Nom # relative
!!€ lähimpänä: lähin+N+Sg+Ess
0:n   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:mpä   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:mmä   N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:mp    N_FRONT_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:mm    N_FRONT_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:n   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:mpä   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ÄN ;
0:mp    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:mp    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:n   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:mpä   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:mp    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:mmä N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:mp  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_TEN    ;
0:mpä N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

!! Vasen inflects almost like superlative:

LEXICON N_VASEN
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 35
!!€ vasen: vasen+N+Sg+Nom # left
!!€ vasempana: vasen+N+Sg+Ess
0:n   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:mpa   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:mma   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS   ;
0:mp    N_BACK_STRONG_PLURALS ;
0:mm    N_BACK_WEAK_PLURALS    ;
0:n   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:mpa N_BACK_PARTITIVE_A ;
0:mpa   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:mp    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:mp    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:n   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:mpa   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IN ;
0:mp    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:mma N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:mp  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:n   N_COMPOUND_TEN    ;
0:mpa N_COMPOUND_IN  ;

!! !-nen suffixed forms
!! Number of derivations end in -nen, that has special alternation pattern.

LEXICON N_AAKKOSTAMINEN
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 38 back
!!€ aakkostaminen: aakkostaminen+N+Sg+Nom # alphabetising
!!€ aakkostamisena: aakkostaminen+N+Sg+Ess
0:nen     N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:se  N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:s   N_BACK_PLURALS  ;
0:s   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:se  N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:s   N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:s   N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:s   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0         N_COMPOUND_S   ;
0:se      N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:s       N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

LEXICON N_KYLKIÄINEN
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 38 front
!!€ kylkiäinen: kylkiäinen+N+Sg+Nom # add-on
!!€ kylkiäisenä: kylkiäinen+N+Sg+Ess
0:nen     N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:se  N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:s   N_FRONT_PLURALS  ;
0:s   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:se  N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:s   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:s   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:s   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:s   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0         N_COMPOUND_S   ;
0:se      N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:s       N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:s       N_COMPOUND_TEN ;

!! !-s final words
!! The s final words have some variation patterns that are determined 
!! lexically.

!! The basic variation is s:ks, with e before the singular suffixes.
LEXICON N_VAKUUTUS
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 39 back
!!€ vakuutus: vakuutus+N+Sg+Nom # insurance
!!€ vakuutuksena: vakuutus+N+Sg+Ess
0:s   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kse   N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ks    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:s   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:kse   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ks    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ks    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:s       N_BACK_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:ks    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kse N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ks  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_TEN  ;

LEXICON N_RÄJÄYTYS
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 39 front
!!€ räjäytys: räjäytys+N+Sg+Nom # explosion
!!€ räjäytyksenä: räjäytys+N+Sg+Ess
0:s   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:kse   N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0:ks    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:s   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:kse   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ks    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:ks    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:s       N_FRONT_GENITIVE_TEN    ;
0:ks    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:kse N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ks  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_TEN  ;

!! Some of the s final stems have additional s:t:d variation in singular
!! stems. Most notably, the UUs derivations are in this class.

LEXICON N_AAKKOSELLISUUS
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 40 back
!!€ aakkosellisuus: aakkosellisuus+N+Sg+Nom # alphabetificationness
!!€ aakkosellisuutena: aakkosellisuus+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ aakkosellisuudessa: aakkosellisuus+N+Sg+Ine
!!€ aakkosellisuuksina: aakkosellisuus+N+Pl+Ess
0:s   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te   N_BACK_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:de   N_BACK_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ks    N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:t   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:te   N_BACK_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ks    N_BACK_PARTITIVE_IA    ;
0:ks    N_BACK_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ks    N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:de  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ks  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

LEXICON N_KÖYHYYS
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 40 front
!!€ köyhyys: köyhyys+N+Sg+Nom # poverty
!!€ köyhyytenä: köyhyys+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ köyhyydessä: köyhyys+N+Sg+Ine
0:s   N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:te   N_FRONT_STRONG_SINGULARS    ;
0:de   N_FRONT_WEAK_SINGULARS    ;
0:ks    N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:t   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:te   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:ks    N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_IÄ    ;
0:ks    N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IEN    ;
0:ks    N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IIN    ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:de  N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0:ks  N_COMPOUND_IEN ;

!! Some s final words have special lengthening inflection.

LEXICON N_PATSAS
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 41 as
!!€ patsas: patsas+N+Sg+Nom # statue
!!€ patsaana: patsas+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ patsaissa: patsas+N+Pl+Ine
0:s   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:a N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:s   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:a N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:a   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_RUUMIS
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 41 is
!!€ ruumis: ruumis+N+Sg+Nom # body
!!€ ruumiina: ruumis+N+Sg+Ess
!!€ ruumiissa: ruumis+N+Pl+Ine
0:s   N_BACK_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i N_BACK_SINGULARS    ;
0 N_BACK_PLURALS    ;
0:s   N_BACK_PARTITIVE_TA    ;
0:i N_BACK_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0 N_BACK_PARTITIVE_ITA   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0 N_BACK_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0 N_BACK_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:s   N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i   N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON N_ILMATIIVIS
!!€gt-norm: Nouns 41 is front
!!€ ilmatiivis: ilmatiivis+N+Sg+Nom # airtight
!!€ ilmatiiviinä: ilmatiivis+N+Sg+Ess
0:s N_FRONT_NOMINATIVE    ;
0:i N_FRONT_SINGULARS    ;
0   N_FRONT_PLURALS    ;
0:s N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_TÄ    ;
0:i N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_SEEN   ;
0   N_FRONT_PARTITIVE_ITÄ   ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_IDEN   ;
0   N_FRONT_GENITIVE_ITTEN  ;
0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_ISIIN  ;
0   N_FRONT_ILLATIVE_IHIN   ;
0:s N_COMPOUND_0   ;
0:i N_COMPOUND_N   ;
0   N_COMPOUND_IDEN    ;
0   N_COMPOUND_ITTEN   ;

LEXICON  N
avuliaisuus+N:avuliaisuu N_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
ecuadorilainen+N:ecuadorilai   N_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
eloperäisyys+N:elo#peräisyy N_KÖYHYYS  ;
eri-ikäisyys+N:eri-ikäisyy N_KÖYHYYS  ;
etikkakärpänen+N:etikka#kärpä    N_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
etsaus+N:etsau N_VAKUUTUS  ;
etuoikeusjärjestys+N:etu#oikeus#järjesty N_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
fataalius+N:fataaliu N_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
hajuvesikauppias+N:hajuvesi#kauppia N_PATSAS  ;
hypotonisuus+N:hypotonisuu N_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
hyväksikäyttäminen+N:hyväksikäyttämi    N_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
hätäilemättömyys+N:hätäilemättömyy N_KÖYHYYS  ;
höpsötys+N:höpsöty N_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
ihastuminen+N:ihastumi   N_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
ihmisruumis+N:ihmis#ruumi N_RUUMIS  ;
ilmatiivis+N:ilma#tiivi N_ILMATIIVIS  ;
imunesteturvotus+N:imuneste#turvotu N_VAKUUTUS  ;
itätaivas+N:itä#taiva N_PATSAS  ;
jaavankääpiökauris+N:jaavankääpiökauri N_RUUMIS  ;
jäljentäminen+N:jäljentämi    N_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
kaikkeinpyhin+N:kaikkeinpyhi  N_LÄHIN ; 
kalanpyydys+N:kalan#pyydy N_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
kapteenius+N:kapteeniu N_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
kartesiolainen+N:kartesiolai   N_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
kaskinauris+N:kaski#nauri N_RUUMIS  ;
katajapensas+N:kataja#pensa N_PATSAS  ;
kehonrakennus+N:kehon#rakennu N_VAKUUTUS  ;
kerkeys+N:kerkey N_KÖYHYYS  ;
kieriminen+N:kierimi    N_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
koirannauris+N:koiran#nauri N_RUUMIS  ;
koruteollisuus+N:koru#teollisuu N_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
kovaääninen+N:kovaääni   N_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
kreosoottipensas+N:kreosoottipensa N_PATSAS  ;
krominikkeliteräs+N:krominikkeli#terä    N_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
kunnialaukaus+N:kunnia#laukau N_VAKUUTUS  ;
kylänvanhin+N:kylän#vanhi  N_VANHIN ; 
kyyhkynen+N:kyyhky    N_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
käsityskyvyttömyys+N:käsitys#kyvyttömyy N_KÖYHYYS  ;
kääpiökaskas+N:kääpiö#kaska N_PATSAS  ;
laukaisuvalmis+N:laukaisu#valmi N_RUUMIS  ;
leveäsuinen+N:leveä#sui   N_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
levähdys+N:levähdy N_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
liikesalaisuus+N:liike#salaisuu N_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
liittäminen+N:liittämi    N_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
loppusijoitus+N:loppu#sijoitu N_VAKUUTUS  ;
lähin+N:lähi N_LÄHIN  ;
mallioppilas+N:malli#oppila N_PATSAS  ;
marttayhdistys+N:martta#yhdisty N_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
metsäisyys+N:metsä#isyy N_KÖYHYYS  ;
mielenlujuus+N:mielen#lujuu N_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
mieskerjäläinen+N:mies#kerjäläi    N_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
mitalisaalis+N:mitali#saali N_RUUMIS  ;
munankeltuainen+N:munan#keltuai   N_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
muuntamorakennus+N:muuntamo#rakennu N_VAKUUTUS  ;
nelitoistavuotias+N:nelitoistavuotia N_PATSAS  ;
nimetön+N:nimet N_NIMETÖN  ;
nytkäys+N:nytkäy N_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
näyttövelvollisuus+N:näyttö#velvollisuu N_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
omenakärpänen+N:omena#kärpä    N_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
oras+N:ora N_PATSAS  ;
paistovalmis+N:paisto#valmi N_RUUMIS  ;
palloaminen+N:palloami   N_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
paukkupanos+N:paukku#pano N_VAKUUTUS  ;
perifeerisyys+N:perifeerisyy N_KÖYHYYS  ;
piilotyötön+N:piilo#työt N_NIMETÖN  ;
piipitys+N:piipity N_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
piiras+N:piira N_PATSAS  ;
pistesaalis+N:piste#saali N_RUUMIS  ;
pitkäaikaistyötön+N:pitkä#aikais#työt N_NIMETÖN  ;
pölytiivis+N:pöly#tiivi N_ILMATIIVIS  ;
pöytävieras+N:pöytä#viera N_PATSAS  ;
raatokuoriainen+N:raato#kuoriai   N_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
radiopaikannus+N:radio#paikannu N_VAKUUTUS  ;
relaksaatiokäyttäytyminen+N:relaksaatio#käyttäytymi    N_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
retorisuus+N:retorisuu N_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
rippikoulunkäymätön+N:rippi#koulunkäymät N_NIMETÖN  ;
salamahyökkäys+N:salama#hyökkäy N_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
samanikäisyys+N:samanikäisyy N_KÖYHYYS  ;
satavuotias+N:sata#vuotia N_PATSAS  ;
sepalus+N:sepalu N_VAKUUTUS  ;
sirkushevonen+N:sirkus#hevo   N_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
sisin+N:sisi  N_LÄHIN ; 
sivusaalis+N:sivu#saali N_RUUMIS  ;
sävykkyys+N:sävykkyy N_KÖYHYYS  ;
taidevalokuvaus+N:taide#valo#kuvau N_VAKUUTUS  ;
tankojuoppous+N:tankojuoppou N_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
tavoitesäästäminen+N:tavoite#säästämi    N_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
todistaminen+N:todistami   N_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
Tristeys+N:T#ristey N_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
tukkukauppias+N:tukku#kauppia N_PATSAS  ;
uhmamielisyys+N:uhma#mielisyy N_KÖYHYYS  ;
ukonnauris+N:ukon#nauri N_RUUMIS  ;
vanhentuneisuus+N:vanhentuneisuu N_AAKKOSELLISUUS  ;
varsinaissuomalainen+N:varsinais#suomalai   N_AAKKOSTAMINEN  ;
vasen+N:vase   N_VASEN ;
vesitiivis+N:vesi#tiivi N_ILMATIIVIS  ;
vihdas+N:vihda   N_VAKUUTUS  ;
välinen+N:väli    N_KYLKIÄINEN  ;
välkähdys+N:välkähdy N_RÄJÄYTYS  ;
yhdennäköisyys+N:yhdennäköisyy N_KÖYHYYS  ;
